Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
CHAPTER 13 Administrative Regulations [Repealed]

13.010.
Definitions and construction. [Repealed.]

13.020.
Regulations of state agencies must be filed to be effective. [Repealed.]

13.030.
Codification Board created. [Repealed.]

13.040.
Functions of Codification Board. [Repealed.]

13.050.
Effect to be given publication and filing of regulations. [Repealed.]

13.060.
Judicial notice. [Repealed.]

13.070.
Existing regulations not effective unless filed. [Repealed.]

13.075.
Definition of commission. [Repealed.]

13.080.
Definitions and construction. [Repealed.]

13.081.
Administrative bodies may adopt regulations — Effect — Limitation. [Repealed.]

13.082.
Uniformity of power to adopt regulations — Repeal of conflicting provisions. [Repealed.]

13.083.
Definition of “tiering” — Methods of tiering. [Repealed.]

13.084.
Refiling of regulations — Rescinding of regulations not refiled. [Repealed.]

13.085.
Publication, hearing and review of proposed administrative regulation — Emergency regulation — Requisites of proposal — Public hearing. [Repealed.]

13.086.
Agencies to submit regulatory impact analyses — Contents — Review by legislative research commission. [Repealed.]

13.087.
Administrative regulation review subcommittee — Submission of regulations — Procedure upon objection to regulation. [Repealed.]

13.088.
Emergency regulation — Procedure. [Repealed.]

13.090.
Functions of legislative research commission. [Repealed.]

13.092.
No regulation to be effective until accepted by legislative research commission — Exception — Effect of holding this provision unconstitutional. [Repealed.]

13.095.
Publication and distribution of regulations; revolving fund created. [Repealed.]

13.096.
Kentucky administrative regulations service — Administrative register. [Repealed.]

13.097.
Regulations compiler — Certificate — Filing of publication with secretary of state. [Repealed.]

13.100.
Effect of commission’s file stamp on regulation or publication of regulation. [Repealed.]

13.102.
Administrative publication of informational copies. [Repealed.]

13.105.
Judicial notice. [Repealed.]

13.110.
Transfer and filing of regulations filed with Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

13.115.
File of ineffective regulations to be kept. [Repealed.]

13.120.
Statute Revision Commission to draft uniform administrative practice and procedure act. [Repealed.]

13.125.
Notice and hearings on proposed regulations. [Repealed.]

13.130.
Employes of Statute Revision Commission. [Repealed.]

13.135.
Appropriation. [Repealed.]

13.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]